Maryland, session 2025, HB0539.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0539*

HOUSE BILL 539
(b) “Agency” means the State Lottery and Gaming Control Agency.
(g) “Licensed agent” means a person or governmental unit licensed by the
Director to act as a State lottery sales agent.
9–111.
(G) (1) THE AGENCY MAY ALLOW A LICENSED AGENT TO ENTER INTO AN
AGREEMENT WITH A THIRD–PARTY ENTITY TO ALLOW THE ENTITY TO PURCHASE A
STATE LOTTERY TICKET ON BEHALF OF AN INDIVIDUAL IN THE STATE AND DELIVER
THE TICKET TO THE INDIVIDUAL IN THE STATE.
(2) A THIRD–PARTY ENTITY MAY CHARGE A SERVICE FEE FOR
PROVIDING THE SERVICES DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.